ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.dic
Tili/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
achu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
akawasi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
allin/aAtTyYlxXwW
alqo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
amuqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
antachajra/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
apaqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
aqalli/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
arawiku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
asipa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
atimullp'u/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
awilu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ayay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ayranpu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
añaypanku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'allasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'aqo/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'ia/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'imsiy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'iwillu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'upa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ch'utasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chajna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chakipanpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chanpi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chawchu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhaka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhaski/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chhullunku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chimillu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chira/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chiwanwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chuchuwasa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
chupa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
corpaytukuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
illtha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
inti/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
iphupara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
isqounqoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
iñi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jamanq'ay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
janp'ara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jarata/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jawa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jayajpichana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jik'u/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
jojya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
junya/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
juñu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'allapi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'awa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'imchu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'iswan/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
k'umutawna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kachapuri/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kallankarumi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kamanchaka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kaphiama/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
katachillay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khamusqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
khipu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kicha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kimiku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kisillu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kukhi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kunawa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kusi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
kuywina/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llajtamasi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llanp'ukay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llaq'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llik'isqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llojsina/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llunp'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
llutitunpay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
machukay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mallkupaka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mankap'aki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
maraytullma/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mat'u/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mañaqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
millp'una/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
misi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mojmu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
mulli/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
murq'o/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
nak'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ninri/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'acha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'ati/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'ita/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
p'urunku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pachalluqe/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pallasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pantay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
paraqas/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pawi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phajsa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phawajunqoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phullu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
phuñi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pillunkuy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pisku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
pujllana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
puna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
puru/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
puñuna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'apisqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'aytu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'enaqay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'ewlla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
q'osñi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qallar/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qanchiyuyu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qara/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qasawi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qayna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qepaypa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhamata/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhapchikay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhasusqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qheshki/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qhonana/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qollapuqoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qolqeywa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qoqotuwa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
qorwar/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rajch'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ranti/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rayan/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
rit'i/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
runa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ruphayninchej/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sajraña/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
samayp'unchaw/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sansa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
saqey/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sawqá/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sañutika/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
silla/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sinp'ay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
siq'e/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sirk'awnqoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sisu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sojtak'uchu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
suka/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
sunqotu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
surk'a/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
suysuna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'akasqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'ijsi/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'inkina/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'isansqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
t'ullku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
takillpa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tarpay/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
thawti/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
timpkamuu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tiuti/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
tunqori/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ujllu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
unqoy/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
uska/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
uyuyni/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wachuwachu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wallqa/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wanp'ojqhepaqen/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
warani/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wasitawna/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wayaw/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
wayunkha/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
willkaparu/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
witoj/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yanawirku/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
yojra/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
ñawin/aAtTgGhHyYzZlmMxXwWoOjJkKnNpPu
